Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACT

CHAPTER 418. CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS AND PENALTIES

Sec. 418.001. PENALTY FOR FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINING OR DENYING BENEFITS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person, with the intent to obtain or deny payment of benefits, including medical benefits, under this subtitle or Subtitle C, for himself or another, knowingly or intentionally:

(1) makes a false or misleading statement;

(2) misrepresents or conceals a material fact; or

(3) fabricates, alters, conceals, or destroys a document other than a governmental record.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is:

(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the value of the benefits is less than $2,500; and

(2) a state jail felony if the value of the benefits is $2,500 or more.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 1.47, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 463 (H.B. 2053), Sec. 4, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 418.002. PENALTY FOR FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINING WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person, with the intent to obtain workers' compensation insurance coverage under the workers' compensation insurance laws of this state or to avoid payment of premiums due for that coverage, for himself or another, knowingly or intentionally:

(1) makes a false statement;

(2) misrepresents or conceals a material fact; or

(3) makes a false entry in, fabricates, alters, conceals, or destroys a document other than a governmental record.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is:

(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the amount of premium avoided is less than $2,500; and

(2) a state jail felony if the amount of the premium avoided is $2,500 or more.

(c) The court may order a person to pay restitution to an insurance company, including the Texas Mutual Insurance Company, if the person commits an offense under this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 1.47, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1195, Sec. 2.12, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 463 (H.B. 2053), Sec. 5, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 418.003. ELECTION OF PROSECUTION. A person who commits an offense under this chapter may be prosecuted under this chapter or any other law of this state under which the person may be prosecuted.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 429 (S.B. 1627), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 418.004. SUBPOENA AUTHORITY. (a) The commissioner may issue a subpoena to compel the attendance and testimony of a witness or the production of materials relevant to an investigation of an offense under this chapter.

(b) The commissioner may issue a subpoena under Subsection (a) regarding a witness or materials located in this state or in another state.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 463 (H.B. 2053), Sec. 6, eff. June 9, 2017.